Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-533
Waterworks; construction; bids.

All contracts for the construction of any work pursuant to sections 17-530 to 17-532, or any portion of such work, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and upon not less than twenty days' published notice of the terms and conditions upon which the contract is to be let having been given by publication in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city or village. In all cases the city council or village board of trustees shall have the right to reject any and all bids that may not be satisfactory.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 177;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 167;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 296;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 133;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 250;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 256;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 127;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 271;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 137;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 151;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 131;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 157;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 142;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-533;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 159.
August 24, 2017
Estimate of costs must be made and submitted by city engineer before council can make contract and such estimate cannot be raised by the engineer after the bids have been opened. Murphy v. City of Plattsmouth, 78 Neb. 163, 110 N.W. 749 (1907).

City is only authorized to contract after advertising for bids and with only such persons as tender a bid in response to such advertisement. Fairbanks, Morse & Co. v. City of North Bend, 68 Neb. 560, 94 N.W. 537 (1903).